(lp0
V\u000aI just want to tell my family thank you, my mom and  dad and sister and Sabrina. I love you Mercedes. I am sorry to David\u2019s family.  This is only way that I can be forgiven. You got your justice right here.  That\u2019s it. My trust in Jesus.\u000a \u000a\u000a
p1
aV\u000aI would like to thank everyone that has showed up on my  behalf, Kathryn Cox, I love you dearly.  Thank you Randy Cannon for  showing up and being a lifelong friend.  Thank you Dr. Steve Ball for  trying to bring the right out.  There are a lot of injustices that are  happening with this.  This is wrong.  Thank you Reverend Leon  Harrison for showing me the grace of God.  Thank you for all of my friends  that are out there.  This is not a capital case.  I never had  intended to do anything.  I feel very grieved for the loss of Walker, and  for Donovan and Marissa Walker.  I hope they can find peace and be  productive in society.  I would like to thank all of my friends on the row  even though everything didn\u2019t work, close isn\u2019t good enough.  I hope that  positive change will come out of this.\u000aI would like to thank my father and mother for everything  that they showed me.  I would like to apologize for putting them through  this.  I would like to ask for the truth to come out and make positive  changes.  Above all else Donovan and Marissa can find love and  peace.  I hope they overcome the loss of their father.  At no time  did I intend to hurt him.\u000aWhen  the truth comes out I hope that they can find closure.  There are a lot of  things that are not right in this world, I have had to overcome them  myself.  I hope all that are on the row, I hope they find peace and solace  in their life. Everyone can find peace in a Christian God or whatever God they  believe in.  I thank you mom and dad for everything, I love you  dearly.  One last thing, I thank all of my friends that showed loyalty and  graced my life with more positive.  I would also like to thank Gustav\u2019s  mother for having such a great son, and showing me much love.  I have met  good people on the row, not all of them are bad.  I hope everyone can see  that.  I just want to thank everybody that came to witness this.  I  thank everyone, I am sorry things didn\u2019t work out.  May God forgive us  all?  I am sorry mother and I am sorry father.  I hope you find peace  and solace in your heart.  I know there is something else I need to  say.  I feel that.  \u000a
p2
aV\u000aYeah, first off, I want to say that I am sorry for the  pain that I have caused you people.  I am sorry that I cannot bring  everybody back.  I wish it could be different.  I know it would be  hard for you to understand what went on that night, I can\u2019t bring them back as  much as I would like to.  I love my daughter and all of my  supporters.  I pray that the Lord take care of me and all of you.  I  have no bad sentiment towards anyone.  I can understand your outrage and  why you are mad at me.  God be with all of us.\u000a\u000a
p3
aV\u000a\u201cYes, I would like to thank my family and friends for what  y\u2019all have done for me.  Thank you for being here with me that I do not  have to transition alone.  I have peace.  To my daughter, I love you,  to my grandbabies, sisters and brothers, I love you.  I am ready to go  home.\u201d\u000a\u000a
p4
aV\u000a"Much has been written about this case, not all of it has been the truth. But the time is over and now it is time to move on. I want to thank my attorneys for all that they have done. The have afforded me the last quarter of a century. I would like to thank my wife, my daughters, family and friends for unwavering support, and all of the letters and well wishes over the years. Now it is time to pass on. I have fought the good fight, I held the faith. I am not going to say goodbye, I will simply say until we meet again. I love you very, very much. Thank you Warden."\u000a\u000a
p5
aV\u000aThat each new indignity defeats only the body. Pampering the spirit with obscure merit. I love you all, that's it. \u000a\u000a
p6
aV\u000aJoanna I really love and care about her, I appreciate  her.  There is a drawing that I forgot to tell you about, send it to  Stacy.  Art, I appreciate you.  Joanna, tell my family I love them  all.  Trix I love you too.  \u000aTeresa I am really sorry, please don\u2019t have hate in your  heart.  I really feel like this.  I hope you can find peace in your  heart and happiness.  A revenge death won\u2019t get you anything.   Joanna, I love you.  Let\u2019s ride.\u000a\u000a
p7
aV\u000aTo the victim\u2019s family, I want you to know that I hope  you let go of all of the hate because of all my actions.  I came in as a  lion and I come as peaceful as a lamb.  I\u2019m at peace.  I hope society  sees who else they are hurting with this.  To my loved ones, I hope both  victims find in their hearts to forgive me, and I have forgave everyone and I  love everyone, pray for my soul and I forgive myself.  I love y\u2019all and  I\u2019ll be waiting for y\u2019all, my brother take care of my family.  Take care  of my girl, my mom, my sons and all of my loved ones.  Brother Wayne and  Brother Joe, thank y\u2019all.  Jorge don\u2019t give up on Luis, I\u2019ll be  listening.  Thank you for everything.  Father I commend my soul,  please take care and watch everybody I leave behind.  I am ready  Warden.  Father please accept my soul.  I am sorry, I love y\u2019all, I  am always going to be with you.  I love y\u2019all, I love y\u2019all. I love you  Father, I love you Father, I love you Savior.\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a
p8
aV\u000aI just want to tell my family  I love them; my son, I love him. The girls on the row, I love them and keep  their heads up. Tell Darlie I love her, hand in hand. God bless y'all. I'm  alright. Tell them I finished strong. I love y'all. I'm done. I love you,  Richie. I love you. Thank you, Brad and John, all of y'all. God is good. I love  you, Auntie. I'm done.\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a
p9
aV\u000aNesha, I love you. I hope this brings you some closure. Titus, if his kids are out there, I'm sorry for your dad. Shan, Charlotte, Baisey, I love you. T.T., I love you. Stay strong.\u000aMichelle, Tammy, Damen, I'm going home. Lawrence, I love you. I am going home to be with the Lord. Find it in your hearts to forgive me. I'm sorry, stay strong. Jesus, take me home.\u000a\u000a\u000a\u000a
p10
aV\u000a(Written statement) \u000a  I always said that if I even get to this point, I would have already said everything that needed to be said to all of those who I love and have been with me throughout this whole journey. Today, I realized that I can never say everything that needed to be said, because there is still so much that needs to be said. First of all, I love you. My children, my friends, and all my brothers who have shared this experience with me on the row and who continue to experience this without me, keep your heads up. I love all of you. Secondly, I am ok. I have peace in my heart and ready for the next journey. I'm really ok. Last but not least, to my true brother in life, Crazy J, I love you, man. You and Bella have been the best. I'm sorry I couldn't talk with you before all of this, but you know me...You are my bro. I love you. I'm ok. My babies, remember what I said. We'll be together soon. I love all of you. John 14:27. \u000a(Spoken statement)\u000aYes, I left a written statement. I do \u000ahave a verbal statement. I would like to remind my children once again, I love them. Crazy J, I forgot to write a list. Everything is ok. I love you all, and I love my children. I am at peace. John 14:27. I am done, Warden. \u000a\u000a\u000a
p11
aV\u000aYes, sir. First I would like to thank God for letting me see my family. I say this with love, I'm sorry. I say this for my family with love and with God, I love you. I'm happy, and I would like to say on behalf of my family, I love y'all. I am happy. I look into my family's eyes, and I see sadness. Don't be sad, I'm happy. I am sorry for what I have done. Be mindful that I am happy till the end. To the family of my boss, I love you. Young people, listen to your parents; always do what they tell you to do, go to school, learn from your mistakes. Be careful before you sign anything with your name. Never, despite what other people say. God is with y'all. God is the only witness that knows what happened that night. I, Ramiro Hernandez, say this with lots of love to young people, listen to your parents please. Live your life to the fullest, you only live your life once. To the prison system, I would like to thank y'all. Thanks to the officers and to the warden that are going to witness this. I say this with a lot of love and happiness. I have no pain and no guilt. All I have is love. Love will win. Thank you God, I am going with you. \u000a\u000a\u000a
p12
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a\u000a
p13
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a\u000a
p14
aV\u000a(Written statement) \u000a  I just want to make a statement to all my friends, family, and supporters. Thank you all for the love. To the Christian hip-hop community, all the positive brothers I've done time with. To all the people that took the time to write a letter. Thank you.\u000a    To my family, we are one. To my beautiful daughter, the best thing that ever happened to me. I love you endlessly. I am you and you are me forever.\u000a      Lastly to God himself....Thank you being a gracious friend to me.  I love you with all my heart, mind, strength, in Jesus name.\u000a(Spoken statement)\u000a  I want to say to my family, please take care of each other, stay strong and faithful to God. I thank everyone for supporting me. Christine, I love you. To my daughter: baby, be strong, be positive, have a great life. You know what you meant to me, and I love you. Stay faithful to the Lord. Daughter, I love you, I love you, I love you. May the Lord God almighty in heaven, Jesus Christ see my spirit. Amen. \u000a\u000a\u000a
p15
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a\u000a
p16
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a\u000a
p17
aV\u000aI would like to tell the Canfield family I'm sorry; sorry for your loss. I wish I could take it back, but I can't. I hope this gives you closure. I did not murder your loved one, it was an accident. I didn't mean for it to happen. I take full responsibility.\u000aTo my family, we've talked earlier and you know I'm at peace. God is the ultimate judge, he knows what happened. We talked earlier. I love all of y'all. I'm ready Warden.\u000a \u000a\u000a
p18
aV\u000aThe best time in my life is during this period. If I had to do again, I would not change a thing. I have been touched by an angel's wings. If I had it to do again, I would change Dwyer's parents suffering, because I know they are. I know that is not going to eliminate the pain, because I have a child. God, I want to say something so bad. I appreciate the people that helped me out. I appreciate the people that helped me out, and uh, know that I love you, Angel and your family and all the people that helped me out. And if this takes the pain away, so be it. I love you. I'm ready to go. \u000a \u000a\u000a
p19
aV\u000aI love you. To Gerald: you're a zero. I love you Mandy, Tiffany. I love you, too. \u000a \u000a\u000a
p20
aV\u000aI don't know if you remember back in 2000, you were happy the way it happened. You were looking for me yourself and would have taken care of me yourself. I am glad it happened this way. I wouldn't want to see you in my shoes. You would have probably been here, not me. I wouldn't wish this on you. I hope this can bring some relief to you and your family. I have no hate for you.\u000a(In Spanish): Grandmother, Lilia, and Robert; have hope for me. I am with God. Thanks for being with me and all of your love. Mom, take care of my daughter. Many kisses, Mom.\u000aRobert don't forget what I told you, I hope that this serves as an example for the youngsters. Think about it before you make a bad decision. \u000aLet's go, Warden. I'm ready. \u000a \u000a\u000a
p21
aV\u000aI want to thank all of my family and friends for supporting me. I love you and I'm glad that ya'll are by my side through this whole thing. I know it's hard for ya'll. I love you Jennifer, mom, Jaime, Cory, David. Thank God for you being there for me. It's not easy, this is a release. Ya'll finally get to move on with your lives. Take care of my kids and stay strong, life has to go on. We've all lost grandpas, brothers, and sisters. Support and love each other. Don't fight with each other. I love you.\u000a \u000a\u000a
p22
aV\u000aI hereby declare, Robert Steven Everett and Nicholas Velasquez, guilty of crimes against me, Douglas Alan Feldman. Either by fact or by proxy, I find them both guilty. I hereby sentence both of them to death, which I carried out in August 1998. As of that time, the State of Texas has been holding me illegally in confinement and by force for 15 years. I hereby protest my pending execution and demand immediate relief.\u000a \u000a\u000a
p23
aV\u000aYes, I want to thank my family for supporting me through this. I love ya'll. I don't fear death. I'm fine, I'm OK. To my friends and my loved ones, Miriam, I love you, thanks for being here for me. This is what it is. I know this is hard for ya'll, but we are going to have to go through it. We know the lies they told in court. We know it's not true. I want you to be strong and keep going. \u000a \u000a\u000a
p24
aV\u000aYes, I would like to tell my wife that I love her and thank her for all the years of happiness. That will be all, Warden.  \u000a \u000a\u000a
p25
aV\u000aI just wanted to say thanks to all who have supported me over the years: Reverend Campbell, for my spiritual guidance; Aaron, the father of Darrian, my son; and Maurie, my attorney. Thank you everybody. This is not a loss, this is a win. You know where I am going. I am going home to be with Jesus. Keep the faith. I love ya'll. Thank you, Chaplain. \u000a \u000a\u000a
p26
aV\u000aI just want to say I don't want you to have hate in your heart for me, because I took your loved one. I know it doesn't mean anything; I told the truth because I feel like you should know who killed your loved one. God watches everything. Don't hate me, if you do, you'll have to deal with Him later. For me, live your life but don't hate me. I'm sorry for taking your loved one.\u000aMs. Suzy, Susan, thank you for fighting for me in the courts. Thank you for supporting me for all these years. Elroy Chester wasn't a bad man, I knew me. A lot of people say I didn't commit those murders, I really did it.\u000aThat's my statement. Warden, you can go ahead. \u000a \u000a\u000a
p27
aV\u000aYou clown police. You gonna stop with all that killing all these kids. You're gonna stop killing innocent kids, murdering young kids. When I kill one or pop one, ya'll want to kill me. God has a plan for everything. You hear? I love everyone that loves me. I ain't got no love for anyone that don't love me.\u000a\u000a
p28
aV\u000aFirst of all; Shonna talk to your brother. He'll tell you the truth about what happened to your husband. I told Bubba to tell you what happened. Now, my statement to the world:  I am in the midst of truth. I am good, I am straight, don't trip. To all my partners, tell them I said like Arnold Schwarzenegger, "I'll be back." These eyes will close, but they will be opened again, my understanding of God is, Jesus has got me through. To my family, I love ya'll. \u000a \u000a\u000a
p29
aV\u000aLife is death, death is life. I hope that someday this absurdity that humanity has come to will come to and an end. Life is too short. I hope that anyone that has negative energy towards me will resolve that. Life is too short to harbor feelings of hatred and anger. That's it.\u000a \u000a\u000a
p30
aV\u000aTo my loved ones and dear friends, I love ya'll and appreciate ya'll for being there. I am going to a better place. To all the guys back on the row, keep your heads up, keep up the fight. I am ready. Let's go.\u000a  \u000a\u000a
p31
aV\u000aMs. Connie Hilton, I'm sorry for what happened to you. If I hadn't raped you, then you wouldn't have lived. If you look at the transcripts, I didn't kill Mr. Newman and I didn't rob your house. There are two people still alive. I was just there. When I saw you in the truck driving away, I could have killed you but I didn't. I'm not a killer. My momma was abused. I'm sorry for what you've gone through. It wasn't me that harmed and stole all of your stuff. If you look at the transcripts you will see. I ask the good Lord to forgive me.\u000aI love ya'll; Sheena, my sister, momma, and daddy. Ya'll pray for me, keep up the fight. Get the transcripts, let the truth come out so that I do not die in vain. I thank the Lord for the man I am today. I have done all I can to better myself, to learn to read and write. Take me to my King. I love ya'll and thank you for the love you gave me. I respect all of ya'll. Ms. Hilton. Ok. Let me rest. It's burning.\u000a  \u000a\u000a
p32
aV\u000aHey mom and pop. I love ya'll, all of you people in there. You know, ya'll have to come together, you too Terrella. Ya'll work on that. We all have to stand before God at the end of the day. Don't ever think you're perfect, none of us are perfect. God is the only one that is perfect. Jesus is perfect. I did wrong, now I am paying the ultimate price, even though it's a crooked way. I don't hate ya'll. Don't judge, I'm not judging. God has to judge those people. I forgive. Always remember, Romans 12:19 is for real, hell is for real. If ya'll don't have your life right, get it right. We all have to die to get to heaven. Get your life right with Christ; it's coming to an end. I'm talking to each and every soul in this building, in this room. I don't hate nobody, you're doing what you think is your job. God's law is above this law.\u000aHang on. Cowboy up, I'm fixing to ride. Jesus is my ride. Tell my babies daddy will look down on them. Put a "C" in his name for Carl. Tell my boys and tell Tracy to keep on keeping on. Love one another, go to church, change your life for Christ, live your life for Christ. All right, Warden. Terella, I feel it babe, love. \u000a\u000a
p33
aV\u000aYes, Warden. Mom, Celeste: Please know I'm innocent and I love you both. Please continue to fight for my innocence even though I'm gone. John, Cort, Allen, Barbara, Louis, and Anna: Thank you for helping me and trying to save my life. I love you. Give everybody my love. Jason, thank you for your friendship. Thank Laura, too. I love all of you. Bye. Ok, Warden.\u000a\u000a
p34
aV\u000aCan you hear me? Did I ever tell you, you have dad's eyes? I've noticed that in the last couple of days. I'm sorry for putting you through all this. Tell everyone I love them. It was good seeing the kids. I love them all; tell mom, everybody. I am very sorry for all of the pain. Tell Brenda I love her. To everybody back on the row, I know you're going through a lot over there. Keep fighting, don't give up everybody.\u000a\u000a
p35
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a\u000a
p36
aV\u000aTo all of ya'll over here: Mr. Bivins, Allen, Joey, all of ya'll back there, I am truly sorry. I never meant to cause ya'll so much pain. Not one day has passed that I wish I could take it back. After today, I hope you can go on. I hope this brings you closure. God knows I didn't want to do what I did. I loved your daughter. I hope to God, He lets me see her in Heaven so I can apologize to her. I'm sorry. I'm glad ya'll came. Joey, I am really sorry, Joe.\u000aMarjo, you have been there for me for six and a half years. I appreciate that. Take good care of her. I love both of ya'll.\u000aI want to say goodbye to all of ya'll. Goodbye. Please tell my daughter I love her. I'll see ya'll. I'm sorry, Joey, I'm sorry. \u000a  \u000a\u000a
p37
aV\u000aTo the victim's family, I am sure I know that I took somebody special from ya'll. I know it wasn't right, it was wrong. I wish I could give it back, but I know I can't. If giving my life in return makes it right, so be it. I ask that ya'll forgive me. I know God forgave me. I know He has forgiven me for what I did. I don't believe that taking my life will solve anything. I believe that if I was locked up for the rest of my life, that would be more of a punishment. To do this is setting me free. God bless ya'll. I wish there was something I could do.\u000aBernard, thank you. Bill, thanks for being there for me and showing me to the Lord. I give glory to God, I believe I am going home. I love my family. I love everybody. I have love in my heart for ya'll and for my family, we're all victims behind what I did. I wish there was some other way to show I'm sorry. I have a prayer that me and my wife have come up with that I'd like to say. God, hear our prayer. We want to give thanks for this day. I can't do that prayer, that prayer is not right for ya'lls family or my family. Please forgive me. I love ya'll. OK Warden, I am ready. I'm going home. I love ya'll. I'm feeling it. \u000a  \u000a\u000a
p38
aV\u000aI'm an innocent man. I did not kill anyone. Ya'll are killing an innocent man. My left arm is killing me. It hurts bad.\u000a  \u000a\u000a
p39
aV\u000aYes, you know I sat in my cell many days wondering what my last words would be: love for my family, grandson, friends. I love you very much. Tonight when I close my eyes, I'll be with my Father. Some time ago I got a letter, I read it, and stuck it in with a bunch of stuff; and I thought to myself, what a cold-hearted person. I was asked about the letter, I spent half the night looking for the letter. A little part of the letter touched me. Over the years I have learned to love. God is everything. God is my life. Tonight, I will be with Him. I am a parent myself.  I have so much for this dear lady. I understand where they're coming from, I thought every person was cruel. I love you so, Susan. You know what it is girl, love ya. Maurie, appreciate it girl. Much love to you all. Mrs. Cox, love you. Momma, you are my hero. I wish this world was just like you. Another mother got hurt, as a parent I understand the pain. That letter she wrote wasn't wrong, she was just hurting. She showed God's love for letting me know that love will be there to welcome me home. I love you all. I don't know what you are going to feel after tonight. I love you. I pray one day we will all meet in heaven. A man told me 11 years ago the hardest thing to say is, "I forgive you." Hope one day we all be together again. I love you all: Susan, Mrs. Cox, momma, Maurie, Michael. Grandbabies make the world go around. I love you all. Warden, I am looking to leave this place on wings of a homesick angel. Ready to go home to meet my maker. What a friend we have in Jesus, oh my God, I lay in awe 'cause I love you God. I love you momma. I love you Susan. \u000a\u000a\u000a
p40
aV\u000aI want to tell ya'll, know that I love you. Billy, I love you, English, Hart and Eloise. Dwight, take care of Dwight. I'm going home, I'm going home. I'll be alright, don't worry.  I love ya'll. God bless and the Texas Rangers, Texas Rangers. \u000a\u000a\u000a
p41
aV\u000aBohannon, Peg and Kim, I love ya'll. Son, get your life right with Christ, also your mother. Give mom a hug for me and tell her that I love her. Ya'll do understand that I came here a sinner and leaving a saint. Take me home Jesus, take me home Lord, take me home Lord. I ain't left yet, must be a miracle. I am a miracle. I see you, Rich. Don't cry son, don't cry baby. I love ya'll. I'm ready. \u000a\u000a\u000a
p42
aV\u000aYes, I would like to tell my family that I love ya'll and I wish ya'll well. I'm ready. \u000a\u000a\u000a
p43
aV\u000aFirst, I want to let my mom know not to cry, there is no reason to cry, everybody dies. Everybody has their time, don't worry about me. I'm strong. To my family: my old man, my kids, daddy is sorry. I love each and every one of you. I'll be looking for you. To my wife, I love you. The last two years have been the best. All my kids, mom, nieces, and nephews, I am proud of all of ya'll. I love each and every one of ya'll. I really love ya'll.\u000aTo the victims, I'm very sorry for everything that happened. I am not the malicious person that you think I am. I was real stupid back then. I made a great many mistakes. What happened was wrong. I was a kid in a grown man's world. I messed up, and I can't take it back. I wasn't old enough to understand. Please don't carry around that hurt in your heart. You have got to find a way to get rid of the hate. Trust me, killing me is not going to give you closure. I hope you find closure. Don't let that hate eat you up, find a way to get past it.\u000aLinda, I love you, I appreciate you. I hate the way things turned out. Ms. Sheri, thank you. To the victims again, I hate the way all of this happened to ya'll. I don't think any good will come of this. I am going to see ya'll again. I love ya'll, be strong for me. Keep your heads up. I came into the world strong. I'll leave the world strong. Warden, go ahead. I am sorry for the victim's family. Murder isn't right, killing of any kind isn't right. Got to find another way.\u000a\u000a
p44
aV\u000aTell my son I love him very much. God bless everybody. Continue to walk with God. Go Cowboys! Love ya'll man. Don't forget the T-ball. Ms. Mary, thank you for everything that you've done. You too, Brad, thank you. I can feel it, taste it, not bad.\u000a\u000a
p45
aV\u000aAll I want to say is I'm innocent, I didn't kill my wife. Jack Leary shot my wife then her dope dealer Guy Fernandez. Don't hold it against me, Bill. I swear to God I didn't kill her. Go ahead and finish it off. You can taste it. \u000a\u000a
p46
aV\u000aYes, I do. First of all for the Aubrey Hawkins family, I do apologize for everything that happened. Not because I am here, but for closure in your hearts. I really believe that you deserve that. To my wife, Cheri, I am so grateful you're in my life. I love you so dearly. Thank you to my sister and dear friend Katherine Cox, my son and family, friends and family. I love you so dearly. To my friends, all the guys on the row, you have my courtesy and respect. Thank you to the people involved and to the courtesy of the officers. I am grateful for everything in my life. To my wife, take care of yourself. I will be waiting for you. I love you. God Bless. I am ready to go. \u000a\u000a
p47
aV\u000aYes, I want to tell everybody that I love everybody. Keep your heads up. We are all family, people of God Almighty. We're all good. I'm ready. \u000aAre they already doing it? I'm gonna go to sleep. See you later. This stuff stings, man almighty. \u000a\u000a
p48
aV\u000aTo the family of Alyssa Vazquez, I hope you will find peace in your heart. My sympathy goes out to you. I hope you find it in your heart to forgive me. I don't know why all of this happened.\u000aI would like to say to my friends, Jung and Arthur, thank you for being there for me through all of these years. Say goodbye to my family. Pray for me, for my soul, rest in peace.\u000aI don't know why all of this happened. I don't know. Jesus, take me home, take me away from this place. Goodbye my friends. Jung and Arthur, tell my family I love them. I love everybody. Tell Emmanuel and Joseph I love them. \u000a\u000a
p49
aV\u000aNo, I have no final statement. \u000a\u000a
p50
aV\u000aYou're not about to witness an execution, you are about to witness a murder. I am strapped down for something Marcus Rhodes did. I never killed anybody, ever. I love you, Mom. I love you, Tali. This is wrong. This whole thing is wrong. I can't believe you are going to let Marcus Rhodes walk around free. Justice has let me down. Somebody completely screwed this up. I love you too, Mom. Well Warden, if you are going to murder someone, go ahead and do it. Pull the trigger. It's coming. I can feel it coming. Goodbye.\u000a\u000a
p51
aV\u000aI love you Israel. \u000a\u000a
p52
aV\u000aEven though I lay on this gurney, seconds away from my death, I am at total peace. May the Lord Jesus Christ be with me. I am at peace. Hate is going on in this world and it has to stop. Hate causes a lifetime of pain. Even though I lay here I am still at peace. I am still a proud American, Texas loud, Texas proud. God bless America, God bless everyone. Let's do this damn thing. Director Hazelwood, thank you very much. Thank you everyone. Spark, I love you, all of you. I love you Conna. It's all good, it's been a great honor. I feel it; I am going to sleep now. Goodnight, 1, 2 there it goes.\u000a\u000a
p53
aV\u000aI am sorry for everything that I have done. I've hurt a lot of people. For years I have never thought that I deserved any type of forgiveness. Lord Jesus Christ in my life, I know He has forgiven me, I have accepted His forgiveness. I have accepted everything. Let this be final and be done. I take the full blame for this. I am sorry and forgive me. I am truly sorry. I ask for forgiveness. Life goes on and it surely does. I am sorry for the victim's family for what I had did. May they forgive me. I don't know if you believe me, life goes on. I am sure it does. To the man to the right of me, I ask for forgiveness for you. Life goes on, it surely does. I ask for forgiveness. I am truly sorry. That is all. Let's get this show on the road. One more thing, Viva Mexico, Viva Mexico.\u000a\u000a
p54
aV\u000aYes, sir. I just want to say to all my supporters, family and friends; I love y'all and appreciate y'all. To the ones representing me today, thank you for everything. The system has failed me. This is a miscarriage of justice. There are people on death row that need help. I love my family. I love you too, Mom. I am alright. I asked the Lord to have mercy on me and I hope He has mercy on these people carrying out this mass slaughter. They have no respect for humanity.  To Melanie, I never meant to hurt you. You were just in the wrong place at the wrong time. I am not asking for your forgiveness. All I have to worry about is God forgiving me. I hope you get better and for the doctors to continue to take care of you. Take care of my mother for me. To everybody, know that I love you and I am OK. Lord, have mercy on my soul. Lord, have mercy on my soul. Lord, have mercy on these peoples' soul. Life is not supposed to end this way. No more pain and frustration. When I knock at the gates, they will open up and let me in. To my mom and everybody, I love you. I can feel it right now. My life, my life.\u000a\u000a
p55
aV\u000aNoel, I love you man. You have been there for me through thick and thin, you and Brigitta. Be there for each other. I am at peace, we have no worries, just as I have no more worries. To the victim's family, may you be at peace also. \u000a\u000a
p56
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p57
aV\u000aFirst of all I would like to give my sincere   apology to Amy's family. We caused a lot of heartache, grief, pain and   suffering, and I am sorry. I know it won't bring her back. I would like   to sing, I would like to sing for that person's dead. The old is gone. I   am not the same person that I used to be, that person is dead. It's up   to you if you would find it in your heart to forgive.\u000aAs for my family, I am sorry I let you down. I caused a lot of heartache, and I ask for your   forgiveness. I am not crying for myself, I am crying for the lost and   those that are dying for their sins, those that are committing suicide,   those that don't know God and have never been set free. I've been locked   up 13 years. I am not locked up inside, all of these years I have been   free. Christ has changed me. Even though I have to die for my mistake,   he paid for mine by wages I could never pay. Here I am a big strong   youngster, crying like a baby. I am man enough to show my emotions and I   am sorry. I am sorry for everything. I wish I could take it back, but I can't.  \u000a\u000a
p58
aV\u000aNo sir. Warden, Since I don't have nothing to say, you can go ahead and send me to my Heavenly Father.\u000a\u000a
p59
aV\u000aNo\u000a\u000a
p60
aV\u000aNo last statement.\u000a\u000a
p61
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p62
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p63
aV\u000aYes I do, I would like to thank my family for their support, love and understanding. I would like to point out some things, I got your letter. It touched me and changed me. What happened was I been wanting to apologize to yall for your son. They told me not to do it in court. I wrote him a letter but they told me that they tore it up in court. I am not the monster they made me out to be. I made lots of mistakes that took your son. I'll take it to the grave, I will be at peace. You have test and drug results to show it. I am not just taking. I messed up, made poor choices. No rapes, I don't do drugs, I am not an alcoholic. Back to my family, Thank yall for being here. It is what it is. I got peace in my heart. Thank you. Bye bye yall. Bye bye peanut.  \u000a\u000a
p64
aV\u000a I do, I want to address you, I am sorry. I don't know who you are. I am sorry I put you through some things that I can't take back. I am sorry. This isn't going to change anything. Sorry for putting you through this. This is creating more victims. I am sorry, I put you through this. I love you man, I love you. This is not gonna change anything. This person shoe did that 10 years ago isn't the same person you see today. I hurt a lot of people with decisions I made. I can't be more sorry than I am right now. I hurt the Lopes family, let this be a lesson. Your decisions affect everybody. Look after your sister for me. I am always gonna be with you. I love you too Shay I love you if your listening I am sorry to be putting everybody through this. This is the end of this, time to move on. I hope this brings you peace, I am sorry. I told your sister my last words. Danielle, you know that I love you. You know that you have my heart, I've enjoyed these times. I love you little hef.  \u000a\u000a
p65
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p66
aV\u000a Bye, I'm Ready. \u000a\u000a
p67
aV\u000a Yeah, I want to tell my family I love ya'll. Tell Kate I love her too. Tell brother, my kids I live ya'll. I'm gonna miss ya'll. I'm ready, ready. \u000a\u000a
p68
aV\u000a Yes, I do. Thank you for your friendship Reverend Whiteside and thank you for your fellowship. God help me to say this statement correctly. I would like to say goodbye to mom and my brother, brother, sister, Chelsea, Danny, Johnny, Tito and Sylvia. My heart goes is going ba bump ba bump ba bump. I love my children, Roxanne, Roseanne, Melissa, and Louis. I miss them; I will take them with me in my heart. I will keep them in my heart. Thank you Mrs. Dyson for praying for me and everyone that has been praying for me. God loves everybody and myself. I can't say this correctly. Let's see. That's all right. I guess that's it. Our Father, who art in heaven, Hallowed by thy Name. Thy kingdom come. Thy will be done, On earth as it is in heaven. Give us this day our daily bread. And forgive us our trespasses, As we forgive those who trespass against us. And lead us not into temptation, But deliver us from evil. For thine is the kingdom, and the power, and the glory, for ever and ever. Amen. Lord Jesus forgive of my sins, please forgive me for the sins that I can remember. \u000a\u000a
p69
aV\u000a Yes, I have to say that I am sorry for all the pain that I have caused you and your family. I only have love in my heart. I hope that you can all forgive me. I pray that you can all forgive me. Thank you for standing by me and being there for me. I am ready to go home. My baby I will always be with you. I really am sorry.  \u000a\u000a
p70
aV\u000a Yes. From Allah we came and to Allah we shall return. I would like to give thanks for the unjust way my trial attorneys John Donahue and Frank Hollbrook purposely denied me a fair trial. I would like to thank Walter E. Reeves for bringing up claims that did not exist. Most importantly, I would like to thank John Hurley, who was suppose to be off my case but was granted to be back on. For those who kept agreeing with me, keep it real. Ya'll will always stay real in my heart. Barbara, I love you, Al and Paul, I love you. Jess and Chong, I love you now and forever. I am ready for the transition.  \u000a\u000a
p71
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p72
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p73
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p74
aV\u000a Could you please tell that lady right there, can I see her, she is not looking at me. I want you to understand something, hold no animosity towards me. I want you to understand please forgive me. When I get to the gates of Heaven I will open my arms for you. Please forgive me, do not worry about what is going to happen. I don't want you to worry. I don't want you to suffer, I am not mad at you. Shed no tears for me. Even though you don't know me, I love you, I love all of ya'll. I ask ya'll in your heart to forgive me. To my family, I love all of you. What's happening now, you are suffering. I didn't mean to hurt you. Stephanie, Felicia, Carlos and my Father. I love my Father. I want you to understand that life goes on. Continue to live your life and don't be angry at what is happening to me. This is destiny, this is life. This is something I have to do and I am going to be with my momma and your momma. I want everyone to continue to live your life. Thank you and I love all of you. What is happening to me now is unjust and the system is broken. At the same time I bear witness there is no God but Allah and the Prophet Mohammad. Unto Allah, I belong unto Allah I return. I love you.  \u000a\u000a
p75
aV\u000a Can ya'll hear me? Tell my family that I love ya'll. Joe, Tim, everybody - keep your head up. I love you.  \u000a\u000a
p76
aV\u000a Yes, I do.  I thank the Lord for giving me my friends, for getting me the ones I love.  Lord reach down and help innocent men on death row.  Lee Taylor needs help, Bobby Hines, Steve Woods.  Not all of us are innocent, but those are.  Cleve Foster needs help.  Melyssa, I love you girl.  I know I wasn't going to say anything, but I've got to.  Jack, Irene, Danny, Doreen, I love you guys.  I said I was going to tell a joke.  Death has set me free.  That's the biggest joke, I deserve this.  And the other joke is I am not Patrick Bryan Knight, and ya'll can't stop this execution now.  Go ahead, I'm finished.  Come on, tell me Lord.  I love you Melyssa, take care of that little monster for me.  \u000a\u000a
p77
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p78
aV\u000a Yes sir,  I charge the people of the jury.  Trial Judge, the Prosecutor that cheated to get this conviction.  I charge each and every one of you with the murder of an innocent man.  All the way to the CCA, Federal Court, 5th Circuit and Supreme Court.  You will answer to your Maker when God has found out that you executed an innocent man.  May God have mercy on you. My love to my son, my daughter, Nancy, Kathy, Randy, and my future grandchildren.  I ask for forgiveness for all of the poison that I brought into the US, the country I love.  Please forgive me for my sins.  If my murder makes it easier for everyone else let the forgiveness please be a part of the healing.  Go ahead Warden, murder me.  Jesus take me home.  \u000a\u000a
p79
aV\u000a Profanity directed toward staff.  \u000a\u000a
p80
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p81
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p82
aV\u000a Jennifer, where are you at?  I'm sorry, I did not know the man but for a few seconds before I shot him.  It was done out of fear, stupidity, and immaturity.  It wasn't until I got locked up and saw the newspaper.  I saw his face and his smile and I knew he was a good man.  I am sorry for all your family and my disrespect - he deserved better.  Sorry Gus.  I hope all the best for you and your daughters.  I hope you have happiness from here on out.  Quit the heroin and methadone.  I love you dad, Devin, and Walt.  We're done Warden.  \u000a\u000a
p83
aV\u000a To my family, first and foremost - I love you all. The calmness that I was telling you about, I still have it. You are Mario's Uncle, correct? I just wanted you to know that I wronged your family. I received nothing, I was not paid. I took his life for the love of a friend. I love you all. I just want you to know that. I know he does, I feel it. I'm alright. Make sure momma knows, alright. Jermaine, I love you too man. Alright Warden.  \u000a\u000a
p84
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p85
aV\u000a Yes I do.  Debbie, my Baby, I love you; do you know I love you.  You are my life.  You are my wife - always stay strong.  Stay strong everybody.  I am innocent.  I am being punished for a crime I did not commit.  I have professed my innocence for nine years, and I continue to say I am innocent.  Let my people know I love them.  We must continue on.  Do not give up the fight; do not give up hope for a better future.  Because we can make it happen.  I love you, I love my son, and I love my daughter.  Bruno, Chuckie, Juanita, Ray - I love you, all of you.  Stay strong baby.  I love you forever.  \u000a\u000a
p86
aV\u000a Yes, your honor.  I know you people are here to find closure for the things that you have done or that I have done.  There are no words to describe the pain and suffering that you have gone through all these years, that is something that I cannot take back from you all.  I hope that Megan, if she is here present today, know that today I hope you get peace and joy.  I am sorry that it has taken 14 years to get closure.  If it would have brought closure or brought her back, I would have done this years ago, I promise, I promise. My family all knows the sincerity in my heart when I say these words to you.  I didn't mean to inflict the pain and suffering on your family.  I pray that she is safe in Heaven.  I pray that you find closure and strength.  My family prays for you and everybody, if these words can ever touch your heart, I am sorry, I am truly sorry.  Ya'll take care.  I love ya'll.  Pastor tell Megan I am sorry. \u000a\u000a
p87
aV\u000a May I speak to my family?  Honey, I love you.  Be strong and take care of yourselves.  Thanks for being there.  Take care of yourself.  Ms. Irene, thank you for everything you have done.  Chaplain Hart, thank you for helping me.  Gary, thank you.  Maria, Maria, I love you baby.  Thank you for being there for me and all these people here will find the one who did this damn crime.  I am going home to be with God.  Thank you.  Thank you, Warden. \u000a\u000a
p88
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p89
aV\u000a Yes sir, I do.  To the victim's family.  I hope it helps a little.  I do not know how, but I hope it helps.  I love you all, all of you.  You know I love you.  Thank you for bringing my children back to my life.  Thank you.  I love you all.  I love you all very much.  Thank you very much.  (Statement amended 01/09/06)  \u000a\u000a
p90
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p91
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p92
aV\u000a Yes sir.  I would like to ask you to forgive me.  I made a mistake and I am sorry for what I did.  All I can do is ask you to forgive me.  I love you and I will see all of you in Heaven.  I love you very much.  Praise Jesus.  I love you.  Our Father, who art in Heaven, hallowed be thy name.  Thy kingdom come, Thy will be done, on earth as it is in Heaven.  Give us this day our daily bread, and forgive us our trespasses as we forgive those who have trespassed against us.  And lead us not into temptation, but deliver us from evil.  Amen.  \u000a\u000a
p93
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p94
aV\u000a Yes.  Man, there is a lot of people there.  There was a lot of people that got me to this point, and I can't thank them all.  But thank you for your love and support; they have allowed me to do a lot more than I could have on my own.  Sheila, I wish I would have met you seven years ago; it would have been a lot easier.  But I have overcame a lot.  I am not angry, but I am disappointed that I was denied justice.  But I am happy that I was afforded you all as family and friends.  You all have been there for me; it's a miracle.  I love you.  And I have to tell Jessica I am sorry.  I never knew it would come to this.  Lorna, you know you have to keep my struggle going.  I know you just lost your baby; but you have to keep running.  Andy, I love you man.  Tell Andre and them that I didn't get a chance to reach my full potential, but you can help them reach theirs.  You needed me, but I just did not know how to be there for them.  There is so much I have to say, but I just can't say it all.  I love you all.  Please just keep the struggle going.  If you turn your back on me, you turn your back on them.  I love you all and I'll miss you all.  Thanks for allowing me to touch so many hearts.  I never knew I could do it, but you made it possible.  I am just sorry.  And I am not as strong as I thought I was going to be.  But I guess it only hurts for a little while.  You all are my family.  Please keep my memory alive.  \u000a\u000a
p95
aV\u000a Yes sir.  Today I go home to the Lord.  But first, I have to say something.  I am real sorry.  I took family member's life and I shouldn't have.  I hope that you can move on.  I am just sorry.  I don't know what else to say.  I can't bring anyone back.  I would if I could.  I hope you will be fine.  I won't ask for your forgiveness.  God will be my judge.  To my family and friends, I love you all.  You all take care and somebody find Void.  Be strong and I will see you all; hopefully not soon.  Keep your head up.  That is all I have to say.  \u000a\u000a
p96
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p97
aV\u000a Yes. Connie, Nanny, Bea, Kathy and Richard - I love you all and I thank you all very much for supporting me with your love. In the name of Jesus, I am sorry for the pain I caused you all. I am sorry. Gilbert didn't deserve to die and I want you all to know I am sorry. I pray that the good Lord will give you all peace. Okay. \u000a\u000a
p98
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p99
aV\u000a Yes sir, I do.  I would like to thank everybody for coming out tonight and celebrating life.  This is a celebration of life, not death.  Through Jesus Christ, we have victory over death.  I would like to thank the Holy Father and Pope John Paul for their angelic blessings and all the prayers and support.  And thanks to Father (name unknown) and Guido Todeschini for your love and support.  I want to thank everybody around the world and Father, let your will be done.  I am going to keep this statement short.  I love you all.  I am ready, Warden.  \u000a\u000a
p100
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p101
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p102
aV\u000a Can you hear me, Chris?  The Lord is my Shepherd; I shall not want.  He makes me to lie down in green pastures; He leads me beside the still waters.  He restores my soul;  He leads me in the paths of righteousness for His name's sake.  Yea, though I walk through the valley of the shadow of death, I will fear no evil; for Thou art with me;  Thy rod and Thy staff comfort me.  Thou preparest a table before me in the presence of my enemies;  Thou anointest my head with oil;  My cup runneth over.  Surely goodness and mercy shall follow me all the days of my life;  And I will dwell in the house of the Lord forever. I want to thank you for being there with me all these years and supporting me and keeping me in the Word.  Michael, you take care of her and thank you Father Don and Chris.  And I want to thank the media for being nice to me all this time.  Bye, Chris.  I will see you.  Take care of yourselves and you all stay strong.  You keep doing your ministry.  \u000a\u000a
p103
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p104
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p105
aV\u000a I would just...(speaking in French).  I love all of you.  I love you Lundy, Levi, my dad.  I have no grudges against anyone, or any of the things that have gone wrong.  I would like to say to the world, I have always been a nice person.  I have never been mean-hearted or cruel.  I wish everybody well. \u000a\u000a
p106
aV\u000a Written  To the families of Ms. Thompson and Ms. Cutler. I am sorry for what happened and that it was because of me that they are gone.  If there were any way I could change things and bring them back I would. But I can't.  Because of what I caused to happen many people were affected and I am very sorry that I did.  I have made my peace with God and I pray that soon everyone will be able to have closure in their hearts and lives.  To my family and friends, I love you and some day we will all be together again.  \u000a\u000a
p107
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p108
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p109
aV\u000a I would like to say a final prayer: Dear Heavenly Father, I come to you today, Lord, and thank You for this opportunity to be with You in paradise.  I ask You for forgiveness for the ones that need to be forgiven.  Dear Lord, deliver us from evil and give us the comfort and peace and joy that we need.  Dear Lord, I ask You right now to be with each of the witnesses and lift them up and be on solid ground.  Let them know what has gone on and may we all see each other again.  Amen. I would like to thank each witness:  Ms. Cox, Whiteside, Reed, Scott, and Chad.  I am going to go and see Jesus tonight and reserve a special place for each one of you.  You all have been there when no one else was.  Thank you for all of your love and support.  Just know that I am ready to go.  You all know what I've gone through.  I am going to a better place with the Lord.  I'm mad for one reason, that I'm leaving you behind, when I am going to a better place.  Y'all still have to go through this hell on earth.  Just remember the good things and not the bad.  You are all loved and respected. Warden, just give me parole and let me go home to be with the Lord.  \u000a\u000a
p110
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p111
aV\u000a I would like to say to the family, I regret the pain I've put you through and I hope you can get over it someday.  Mom and Dad, I love you.  Take care.  I'm ready.  \u000a\u000a
p112
aV\u000aThe Lord is my Shepherd, I shall not want. He maketh me lie down in green pastures; He leadeth me beside the still waters, He restoreth my soul. He leadeth me in the paths of righteousness for His name's sake. Yea, though I walk through the valley of the shadow of death, I will fear no evil; for Thou art with me. Thy rod and Thy staff, they comfort me. Thou preparest a table before me, in the presence of mine enemies. He anointeth my head with oil; my cup runneth over. Surely goodness and mercy shall follow me all the days of my life, and I will dwell in the House of the Lord forever. Amen. Amen.\u000a\u000a
p113
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p114
aV\u000a Well, I don't have anything to say.  I am just sorry about what I did to Mr. Peters.  That's all.  \u000a\u000a
p115
aV\u000a Yes sir, Thank you.  I love y'all and I want y'all to know that.  Y'all always told me not to worry about myself.  I worry more about you all because I know where I am going.  I want to see you there, so get your heart right.  You know I love you and care for you.  I am going to go with my little boy and play with him.  Y'all take care and I love y'all.  I love y'all.  Chaplain Wilcox, Roger, Robin, Sarah, Grandma.  I love you.  Y'all be careful.  Lord Jesus, I see your Spirit, it's o.k.  I love you. \u000a\u000a
p116
aV\u000a Yes, sir.  I want to give thanks to Father Walsh, my spiritual advisor and Mr. Whiteside and Irene Wilcox and her husband, Jack, and Richard Lopez for being there for me through all of this.  I don't see O'Brien.  Oh, there he is. Thanks to everybody.  Everybody will be all right, because y'all are going where I am going.  Remember what I said, I want to see you all where I'm going.  I want to give thanks.  God, come and do Your will.  I'm ready Warden.  \u000a\u000a
p117
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p118
aV\u000a "I've got one thing to say, get your Warden off this gurney and shut up. I am from the island of Barbados. I am the Warden of this unit. People are seeing you do this."  \u000a\u000a
p119
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p120
aV\u000a Yes, first I would like to speak to the victims' family.  First of all, I would like to say that I do not know any of y'all and that is unfortunate, because I would like to apologize to each and every one of you individually.  I can't imagine what I have taken from y'all, but I do want to apologize and I want to let you know that I did do it.  You guys know that I am guilty and I am sorry for what I have done.  I apologize and I know that you may not be able to forgive me and I know that may not be able to forgive me in this life and in this world, but I hope sometime in the future you will be able to find it in you to forgive me.  And I want you to know that Christina, she did not suffer as much as you think she did.  I promise you that.  I give you my word.  I know you guys want to know where the rest of her remains are.  I put her remains in the Trinity River.  I have said that since I have come to death row.  I want to apologize to you again.  I hope sometime in the future you can forgive me.  Okay, now I want to speak to my mom and my family.  Brother Anderson, Kathy, I want you to know that I appreciate all these years that you have been coming to see me on death row and Daddy, I love you.  I appreciate y'all being here and being strong for me, and Mama, you know I love you, and I appreciate all of these visits, the letters and everything y'all have done for me.  Y'all have been wonderful.  You too, Granny.  I love y'all and you know, I want to apologize to y'all too for what I have done.  For all of the pain that I have caused, but all of this pain has brought us closer together and all of this suffering that we have been through has brought us all closer to the Lord and in the end that is what counts.  Isn't it?  That's what counts in the end; where you stand with Almighty God.  I know that God has used this to change my life.  And it's all been worth it because of that.  If I lie here today where I lie, I can say in the face of death, Jesus is Lord.  He has changed my life and I know that when I leave this body, I am going home to be with the Lord forever.  That is all I want to say.  I love y'all and I won't say goodbye, I will say I will see you again.  I love you, Daddy. Tonight I dance on the streets of gold.  Let those without sin cast the first stone.  \u000a\u000a
p121
aV\u000a I want to thank my family for their help and moral support and for their struggle. It would have been a lot harder without their love. So, I am just going home. I will see ya'll one of these days. Just don't rush it. I will be there always. I 'll always be watching over you. I love you. Okay? Y'all be strong. God bless you. That is where I am going. I love y'all huh. I'll see y'all in Slayton, Texas.  Dios te mandas contigo mi espiritu. (Spanish - God, I command my spirit to go with you.) Alabamos a Dios todos. (Spanish - We all praise God.) Amen Cuida mi familia. (Take care of my family.) I love you. That's it Warden.  \u000a\u000a
p122
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p123
aV\u000a I want to thank my attorneys, Father Walsh...Sylvia, te quiero mucho y a Consulado, te quiero decir muchas gracias por todo. I want to say I am sorry and I say a prayer today for you so you can have peace and I hope that you can forgive me. God is waiting and God is waiting now.  \u000a\u000a
p124
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p125
aV\u000a Verbal Statement: Okay, thank you. To the Weis family, and ah I just want you to know from the bottom of my heart that I am truly sorry. I mean it, I'm not just saying it. Through the years of being in prison I come to hear and respect our life. It was wrong what I did. I know you had to go through a lot of pain and I'm sorry. To the Jones family, the same is true, I am truly truly sorry. I wanted to prepare a longer statement but time ran out. I had the chaplain write down a few words for my friends and for you, my family. I would like him to read them for me, and ah, just please find peace. \u000aChaplain Brazzil recites written statement: To the Jones Family: Please accept my sincerest apology and regrets for what happened to your loved one. It was truly a horrible thing that I did and I regret it deeply. I do not know if this will ease your pain but I truly pray that this will help you find peace. I am sincerely truly sorry. For the Weis Family: The same is true. I regret what happened. I have lived with the guilt and the pain in my heart for taking Donna away from you. There is no way that I can know your pain and sorrow for losing someone so close to you. I truly hope that you will find peace. Please know that I am sorry. I feel that I have to speak out against the practice of the death penalty, although I have no regrets in my case. The death penalty is an unnecessary punishment for society who has other means to protect itself. You cannot rectify death with another death. Whenever the state chooses to take a life and take the power of God into their own hands, whenever our leader's kill in the name of justice, we are all diminished. To my family and friends, father, sister and brother, those that have traveled so far to be here today, please just know that I am at peace. You have all been so good to me through this whole ordeal. I can never find the words to express my love for all of you. Just know that I go with God. Oum - Nama Shiveya I go with God. \u000aLast Verbal Statement: No sir, I just want to pray a chant, do what you have to do.  \u000a\u000a
p126
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p127
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p128
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p129
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p130
aV\u000a Hey, how y'all doing out there? I done lost my voice. Y'all be strong now, alright? Don, thanks man. I love you, Gloria, always baby. That's all I got to say. Hey, don't y'all worry about me, okay?  \u000a\u000a
p131
aV\u000a To my family, I love them. To Kami, I love you and will always be with you. That's it Warden.  \u000a\u000a
p132
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p133
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p134
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p135
aV\u000a I would like to give thanks to God Almighty, by whose grace I am saved through His son, Jesus Christ, without whom I would be nothing today. Because of this mercy and grace, I have come a long way, and I would like to thank God and others who have been instrumental. I would like to say to the Lang family how truly sorry I am in my soul and in my heart of hearts for the pain and misery that I have caused from my actions. I am truly sorry. And to my family I would also like to extend to them the same apology for the pain and misery that I have put them through, and I love them dearly from the bottom of my heart, and one day I would like to see them on the other side. Some I will; some I won\u2019t. I would like to thank all of the men on Death Row who have showed me love throughout the years, but especially the last two or three weeks, and I hold nothing against no man. I am so thankful that I have lived as long as I have. I hope that I have helped someone. I hope that [by] donating my body to science that some parts of it can be used to help someone, and I just thank the Lord for all that he has done for me. That is all I have to say, Warden.  Oh, I would like to say in closing, "What about those cowboys?"  \u000a\u000a
p136
aV\u000a Yes, I would like to give love to my mother, sisters and brothers and let them know that I am thinking of them right now and I want to thank God for giving me such a loving family. To the victim\u2019s family: I hope you will find it in your heart to forgive me as I have forgiven you. I\u2019m ready, Warden.  \u000a\u000a
p137
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p138
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p139
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p140
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p141
aV\u000aI want you all to know I did not do this crime. I wanted to wait for a thirty day stay for a DNA test so you know who did the crime.\u000a\u000a
p142
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p143
aV\u000aYes, to my family, I love you. Please do not mourn my death or my life. Continue to live as I want you to live. I hold no bitterness toward no one. Just remember the light. I\u2019m gonna let this light shine. Let it shine. Let the light shine.\u000a\u000a
p144
aV\u000aTo Kathy\u2019s family and friends that were unable to attend today, I am truly sorry. I hope my dropping my appeal has in some way began your healing process. This is all I am going to do to help you out in any way for the nightmare and pain that I have caused you, but I am truly sorry and I wish I could take back what I did, but I can\u2019t. I hope this heals you.\u000aTo my family: I love you. When the tears flow, let the smiles grow. Everything is all right.\u000aTo my family: I love you.\u000aWarden, ATW.\u000a\u000a
p145
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p146
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p147
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p148
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p149
aV\u000aAdios, amigos, I\u2019ll see ya\u2019ll on the other side. I\u2019m ready when ya\u2019ll are.\u000a\u000a
p150
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p151
aV\u000aThe first statement I would like to make it\u2019s my sister. I want her to know that every thing that is said, every move that is made, every motion, I hold it true to my heart. I hold it in my soul.\u000aI want you to know that I am not guilty and I will say this to the family. I did not kill your daughter. Take it the way you want. Sorry for the pain.\u000aSister, I love you and will be there with you, to help you. I want to talk to you about being there by her. You know what I am saying. I want to thank you, thank you for the words. The dying words, you know. They mean a lot. Make sure he knows what I want him to know.\u000aI want to quote a song that I wrote called "God Living with Us 24 Hours." It goes:\u000aTell the kids I love them and I\u2019ll be there. That\u2019s all I have to say.\u000a\u000a
p152
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p153
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p154
aV\u000aHello, Ms. Ingram, it is good to see you. I said I could talk but I don\u2019t think I am gonna be able to. I heard one of your nieces had some angry words. I didn\u2019t have anything to do with the stay. I spent the last twenty years waiting to figure out what\u2019s going on. I pray that you get over it and that\u2019s the only thing I can think to say. I\u2019m regretful for what I done, but I\u2019m a different person from that time. If you could get to know me over the years, you could have seen it. I\u2019ve got some people over here that believes that.\u000aI want to talk to my friends over here for a second. Well, it\u2019s good to see you guys. Look after Mary Lynn for me. Like I said, I\u2019ve called my mother already, so she knows. Goodbye.\u000a\u000a
p155
aV\u000aFor the pain I have caused you. I am ashamed to even look at your faces. You are great people. To my brothers on Death Row. Mexico, Mexico\u2026(Spanish).\u000a\u000a
p156
aV\u000aI really don\u2019t have much to say. All I want to say is that when the state introduced my sister and my niece as state witnesses, it\u2019s not that they testified against me. The thing is, my lawyers would not subpoena anyone, so they allowed the state to subpoena them to paint a picture to the jury that my own sister and niece was testifying against me.\u000aLinda is innocent of this. I am innocent of this. Now all you all are seeing in the process a perfect example of ol\u2019 freaky deaky Bill Clinton when he signed that anti-terrorism law to shorten the appeals. This is a conspiracy. They used false testimony of a woman that said I had raped her, when the test showed that the foreign pubic hair that was found on her body belonged to no one in that room. They found a drop of sposmosa in the crotch of her pants that was tied to blood type B. My blood type is A. Now the same woman there they brought to testify against this murder case. That woman was under indictment for possession of methamphetamine, delivery of methamphetamine. She could have gotten out of both of those cases. Yet, she swore under oath that she had never been in trouble with the law and none of that mattered. So what does that make this great state? A very high-priced prostitute that sells itself, called justice, to the highest bidder.\u000aI am being charged under article 19.83 of the Texas Penal Code of murder with the promise of remuneration. That means they got to have three people, the one that paid, the one that killed, and the deceased. And the alleged remunerator is out on the streets, so how come I\u2019m being executed today, without a remunerator? This is a great American justice. So if you don\u2019t think they won\u2019t, believe me they will. Ain\u2019t no telling who gonna be next. That\u2019s all I have to say. Especially for the people of the deceased, Sims is innocent and so am I. So the murder is still not there. Today you are a witness, the state (cough). Bye.\u000a\u000a
p157
aV\u000aFirst off, to the Rosenbaum family, to Cindy, to Scott, to everyone, I just want to say I have nothing but love for you. And I mean that from the deepest part.\u000aI can only tell you that Clark did not die in vain. I don\u2019t mean to offend you by saying that, but what I mean by that is, through his death, he led this man to God.\u000aI have nothing but love for you.\u000aTo my family, my soul beloved, you\u2019re so beautiful, for all your love and support is just miraculous, everything that ya\u2019ll have done.\u000aBe sure and tell T.D. he\u2019s in my heart. I send my love to Jay, to everyone. To Roger Burdge.\u000aI have nothing but love for all of you. Like they say in the song, I guess, I just want to go out like Elijah, on fire with the spirit of God. I love you. I\u2019m done.\u000a\u000a
p158
aV\u000aI\u2019d like to apologize and ask forgiveness for any pain and suffering I have inflicted upon all of you, including my family. All of you, I am very sorry. There is a point where a man wants to die in judgment. Though my judgment is merciful, I hope and pray that all those involved as well as the judgment upon ya\u2019ll, will one day be more merciful than mine. God bless you all. God speed. I love you. Remain strong. Ask God to have mercy. I love you all, too. I\u2019m very sorry. I\u2019ve got to go now. I love you.  \u000a\u000a
p159
aV\u000aAs the ocean always returns to itself, love always returns to itself. So does consciousness, always returns to itself. And I do so with love on my lips. May God bless all mankind.\u000a\u000a
p160
aV\u000aI just want to tell Catharina I love you. Take care of yourself. That\u2019s all I have to say.\u000a\u000a
p161
aV\u000aI guess the first thing I want to do is thank some very special people, Sara and Sabrina. And for affording me the opportunity that ya\u2019ll did. It made a real big difference in my life. I thank you. Thank you again from the deepest part of my heart. I\u2019m sorry. The biggest thing I wanted to say was to you and family and I know I haven\u2019t had a chance to talk with ya\u2019ll in any form or fashion or way or manner. And I regret what happened and I want you to know that I\u2019m sorry. I just ask and hope that sometime down the line that you can forgive me. I think in a lot of ways that without that it becomes very empty and hollow and the only thing we have is hatred and anger. I guess the only thing I have to say about the Death Penalty is that a lot of times people think of it as one sided, but it\u2019s not. It\u2019s two sided. There pain on both sides and it\u2019s not an issue that people just sit there and voice off and say, well, this is a good thing, or this is a bad thing. But it\u2019s something that\u2019s, you know, needs to be looked at and desired in each heart. I just hope that all of you can understand that and someday forgive me. I want to thank ya\u2019ll for affording me the opportunity to talk and meet with ya\u2019ll. It meant so much. Thank you so much for being with me and my family. Thank you. I love you.\u000a\u000a
p162
aV\u000aI\u2019m ready to be released. Release me.  \u000a\u000a
p163
aV\u000a1 Corinthians 12:31B \u2013 13:13 (NIV)\u000aAnd now I will show you the most excellent way.\u000aIf I speak in the tongues of men and of angels, but have not love, I am only a resounding gong or a clanging cymbal. If I have the gift of prophecy and can fathom all mysteries and all knowledge, and if I have a faith that can move mountains, but have not love, I am nothing. If I give all I possess to the poor and surrender my body to the flames, but have not love, I gain nothing.\u000aLove is patient, love is kind. It does not envy, it does not boast, it is not proud. It is not rude, it is not self-seeking, it is not easily angered, it keeps no record of wrongs. Love does not delight in evil but rejoices with the truth. It always protects, always trusts, always hopes, always perseveres.\u000aLove never fails. But where there are prophecies, they will cease; where there are tongues, they will be stilled; where there is knowledge, it will pass away. For we know in part and we prophesy in part, but when perfection comes, the imperfect disappears.\u000aWhen I was a child, I talked like a child, I thought like a child, I reasoned like a child. When I became a man, I put childish ways behind me. Now we see but a poor reflection as in a mirror; then we shall see face to face. Now I know in part; then I shall know fully, even as I am fully known.\u000aAnd now these three remain: faith, hope and love. But the greatest of these is love.\u000a\u000a
p164
aV\u000aThank you for setting me free. God bless you all. I love you, Miguel. Take care of my angel, Leslie. Love, Javier Cruz\u000a.\u000a  \u000a
p165
aV\u000aKeep it brief here. Just want to say, uh, family, take care of yourselves. Uh, look at this as a learning experience. Everything happens for a reason. We all know what really happened, but there are some things you just can\u2019t fight. Little people always seem to get squashed. It happens. Even so, just got to take the good with the bad. There is no man that is free from all evil, nor any man that is so evil to be worth nothing. But it\u2019s all part of life, and my family, take care of yourselves. Tell my wife I love her. I\u2019ll keep an eye on everybody, especially my nieces and nephews. I\u2019m pretty good. I love ya\u2019ll. Take care. I\u2019m ready.\u000a\u000a
p166
aV\u000aI have come here today to die, not make speeches. Today is a good day for dying.\u000aEst Sularus Oth Mithas (My Honor Is My Life).\u000a\u000a
p167
aV\u000aI love you all. We had a good service and I\u2019ll be with you. I\u2019ll be waiting for you in Heaven. Ok. Adios. That\u2019s all I have to say.\u000a\u000a
p168
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p169
aV\u000aI want to tell you folks there, of a\u2026 I have a love in my heart for you. I hope you don\u2019t look for satisfaction or comfort or peace in my execution. Jesus Christ is my Lord and Savior and I want him to be yours. I\u2019m sorry for the pain and heartache I\u2019ve caused your family. Too many years I\u2019ve caused all my family problems and heartache. I\u2019m sorry. I wanted to let you know that the Lord Jesus is my life and I just want to go. I\u2019m gonna fall asleep and I\u2019ll be in his presence shortly. I got reason to rejoice and I pray to see all of you there someday.  \u000a\u000a
p170
aV\u000aI\u2019d like to say that for the murders of Ray Hazelwood and Frank Collier, I\u2019m sorry for that pain it has caused you. To my friends, I\u2019d like to say that I love you and I\u2019m glad you\u2019ve been a part of my life. Thank you. I\u2019ll miss you. Remember that today I\u2019ll be with Jesus in paradise. I\u2019ll see you again.\u000aLord Jesus Christ, son of Almighty God, [have] mercy on me as a sinner, forgive me of my sins. I would like to offer up my death for the conversion of sinners on Death Row. Lord Jesus, into your hands I command my spirit.\u000a\u000a
p171
aV\u000aI know you can\u2019t hear me now but I know that it won\u2019t matter what I have to say.\u000aI want you to know that I did not kill your sister. If you want to know the truth, and you deserve to know the truth, hire your own investigators.\u000aThat\u2019s all I have to say.\u000a\u000a
p172
aV\u000aI love all of you all. Thank you for caring so much about me. Keep the faith. I am going to a better place. I hope the victim\u2019s family will forgive me because I didn\u2019t mean to hurt no one or kill no one.\u000aI love you all.\u000a\u000a
p173
aV\u000aI owe no apologies for a crime I did not commit. Those who lied and fabricated evidence against me will have to answer for what they have done. I know in my heart what I did and I call upon the spirit of my ancestors and all of my people and I swear to them and now I am coming home.  \u000a\u000a
p174
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p175
aV\u000aI am sorry for what I did to your mom. It isn\u2019t because I\u2019m going to die. All my life I have been locked up. I could never forgive what I done. I am sorry for all of you. I love you all. Thank you for supporting me. I thank you for being kind to me when I was small. Thank you, God.\u000aAll right\u000a\u000a
p176
aV\u000aMindy, I\u2019m with you, honey. I do not know why, Mindy, you are doing this, but I will still forgive you. You know he is a murderer. Why don\u2019t you support me? He will do it again. Mindy, you are lucky you are still alive.\u000aGive my love to my family. I love them. Mindy, you can stop this.\u000aO.K., I\u2019m ready.  \u000a\u000a
p177
aV\u000aI would like to tell the victims\u2019 families that I am sorry, very sorry.\u000a I am so sorry. Forgive me if you can.\u000aI know it\u2019s impossible, but try.\u000aTake my hand, Lord Jesus, I\u2019m coming home.\u000a\u000a
p178
aV\u000aYes sir, I would like to say to all of you \u2013 the Thornton family and Jerry Dean\u2019s family that I am so sorry. I hope God will give you peace with this.\u000aBaby, I love you. Ron, give Peggy a hug for me. Everybody has been so good to me.\u000aI love all of you very much. I am going to be face to face with Jesus now. Warden Baggett, thank all of you so much. You have been so good to me. I love all of you very much. I will see you all when you get there. I will wait for you.\u000a\u000a
p179
aV\u000aA lot of people view what is happening here as evil, but I want you to know that I found love and compassion here. The people who work here, I thank them for the kindness they have shown me and I deeply appreciate all that has been done for me by the people who work here. That\u2019s all, Warden, I\u2019m ready.  \u000a\u000a
p180
aV\u000aYou all brought me here to be executed, not to make a speech. That\u2019s it.  \u000a\u000a
p181
aV\u000aYes, I do. I would like to tell the surviving victims here, society, my family and friends, that I ask that they forgive me for anything I have done. I beg for your forgiveness. I would like to ask the Lord Jesus Christ for forgiveness and say that in spite of my circumstances, I have been blessed by Him. My first thought is that Jesus Christ came down and separated the humans from God. I would like to see that wall that separates these groups here tonight brought down and that we would all have love and compassion for one another and that you all build a future for all of us. There are a lot of men on the Row who need to be remembered. I love all\u2026\u000a\u000a
p182
aV\u000aJesus, the Lord, is everything to me. I am nothing without him. Praise Jesus. Praise God\u000a.\u000a  \u000a
p183
aV\u000aI am so glad I found God and I am so happy for it.\u000aI love my family and I want them to know that.\u000aThat is about all I have to say.  \u000a\u000a
p184
aV\u000aFirst and foremost I would like to tell the victims\u2019 families that I am sorry because I don\u2019t feel like I am guilty. I am sorry for the pain all of them have gone through during holidays and birthdays. They are without their loved ones.\u000aI have said from the beginning and I will say it again that I am innocent. I did not kill no one. I feel like this is the Lord\u2019s will that will be done.\u000aI love you all. You know it. Don\u2019t cry.\u000aTell my brothers I love them. You all be strong.\u000a\u000a
p185
aV\u000aI want to thank the Lord for giving me this opportunity to get to know Him. He has shown me a lot and He has changed me in the past two months. \u000aI have been in prison 8½ years and on Death Row for 7, and I have not gotten into any trouble. I feel like I am not a threat to society anymore. I feel like my punishment is over, but my friends are now being punished.\u000a I thank the Lord for all He has done for me. I do want to tell the family that I am sorry but killing me is not going to solve nothing. \u000aI really do not believe that if Jesus were here tonight that he would execute me. Jesus is all about love. \u000aI want to thank all of my friends for supporting me and for being here for me. Thank all of my friends on the row. Thank you Lord. I am finished.  \u000a\u000a
p186
aV\u000aMs. Craft and Ms. Bethrie, I don\u2019t know what to say to you   but I apologize for the pain I have caused you and your family over the years. I   hope that you will accept my apology and that you will know that it is sincere.   I hope this will allow you and your family to move on and I hope you will   forgive me and I hope Mr. Hanon [illegible] will forgive me for taking   his life. Please accept my apology. I love you all.\u000aI am finished.\u000a\u000a
p187
aV\u000aI would like to apologize to the victim\u2019s family for all of the pain I have caused them. I would like to tell my family I love them and I hope to see them again soon. Lord Jesus, thank you for giving me the strength and the time in my life to find Jesus Christ and to be forgiven for all of my sins. Thank you for the changes in my life you have given me, the love and closeness of my family, and my beautiful daughter. Thank you for using me -\u000a\u000a
p188
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.\u000a\u000a
p189
aV\u000aFirst, I would like to give praise to God for the love and grace that he has allowed for all of this to come together.\u000aI would like to thank and ask blessings for all of the men who are imprisoned and have shared in my struggle and have allowed me to help them.\u000aI would like to thank my family for their blessings and for sharing my struggle and having been there for me and endured this with me.\u000aI would like to thank the Chaplain and all the rest who have offered their prayers.\u000a\u000a
p190
aV\u000aWell, my friends in my heart, I\u2019m ready \u2013\u000a\u000a
p191
aV\u000aI would like to apologize for all of the pain and suffering I put you all through. I hope this will give you closure now and later on down the line.\u000aBob, I appreciate you coming \u2013 Stacey and Jess.\u000aI will wait for you \u2013\u000a\u000a
p192
aV\u000aGoodbye.\u000aI will wait for you in Heaven. I will be waiting for you. I love my parents. I am at peace with God.\u000aFight for the good.  \u000a\u000a
p193
aV\u000aI would like to say to the Magee family and the Cadena family that I was friends with David and Virginia and I did not commit this offense.\u000aI have tried to do something to compensate the families by writing a book. I would like for the proceeds to go to the Magee family and the Cadena family.\u000aThere is someone who will be contacting them or they can get in touch with my attorney.\u000aI would like to thank you for standing by me and loving me and carry my best to my "sun," my butterfly.\u000aGoodbye, sun, I love you.\u000a\u000a
p194
aV\u000aI have a statement prepared that I have given to the Chaplain that I want released to the media.\u000aI am ready, Warden.\u000a\u000a
p195
aV\u000aIt\u2019s a good day to die. I walked in here like a man and I am leaving here like a man. I had a good life. I have known the love of a good woman, my wife. I have a good family. My grandmother is the pillar of the community. I love and cherish my friends and family. Thank you for your love.\u000aTo the Hancock family, I am sorry for the pain I caused you. If my death gives you any peace, so be it.\u000aI want my friends to know it is not the way to die, but I belong to Jesus Christ. I confess my sins. I have\u2026\u000a\u000a
p196
aV\u000aYes, I do.\u000aIf it matters to anyone, I did not kill Olga.\u000aBrian, thank you for caring.\u000aDee Dee, you have been a good sister to all of us.\u000aAna and Chico (not sure of name he said), trust in God.\u000aI will always love you, Lynn. I will always love you.\u000aO.K., Warden.\u000a\u000a
p197
aV\u000aI would like to tell my family that I love them and always be strong and keep their heads up and keep faith in Jesus.\u000aThat\u2019s it.  \u000a\u000a
p198
aV\u000aI would like to thank all of you for coming. I am sorry for all of the pain I have caused both families \u2013 my family and yours.\u000aI would like for you to know that I am sorry for all the pain I caused for all these years. I have had time to understand the pain I have caused you.\u000aI am ready, Warden.  \u000a\u000a
p199
aV\u000aYes, I would like to praise Allah and I am praying to Allah. Allah is most gracious. I will ask Allah for forgiveness because he created me and he will forgive me.\u000aAll of the brothers on the row stay strong. (Some words about Allah that I couldn\u2019t understand.)\u000aI love my family, my mother. I will see her sooner or later. Life goes on.\u000aDon\u2019t let these people break (couldn\u2019t understand) you. Keep true to nature. You do not have to act like them. Rise above it. (couldn\u2019t understand)\u000aPraise Allah \u2013  (some more Allah mumbling)\u000a\u000a
p200
aV\u000aYes sir, I do. Well, here we are. I apologize for your loss and your pain, but I didn\u2019t kill those people.\u000aHopefully we will all learn something about ourselves and about each other and we will learn enough to stop the cycle of hate and vengeance and come to value what is really going on in this world.\u000aWe can\u2019t look back.\u000aI forgive everyone for this process, which seems to be wrong. We all end up doing experiences which we create.\u000aThat is all I have to say about that.\u000a(There were some unintelligible sentences.)\u000a\u000a
p201
aV\u000aI would like to apologize for all of the hurt, pain and disappointment I caused to my family and all my friends.  I hope all the veterans and teenagers out there who have a drug problem will get help.  I hope the lord will forgive me of all of my sins.  I thank Jack and Kathy for being with me.  I hope that those who support the Death Row inmates will continue to work and maybe we can get this resolved and do away with the Death Penalty.  I hope this is a lot better place where I am going.\u000a\u000a
p202
aV\u000aI want to let all of my people know and everybody who is here and supported me that I love them and wish them all the best.\u000a\u000a
p203
aV\u000aI would like to thank my Lord Jesus Christ for keeping me strong all these years. I would also like to thank my mother for standing by me all these years. I would also like to thank my pen pals, Joe and Camille Tilling and JoAnn for helping me stay strong all these years. I also thank my two lawyers, Rita and Brent, for fighting to keep me alive. I love you, Mom -\u000a\u000a
p204
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p205
aV\u000aFirst of all I want to thank the LORD, my family and my wife Nora for all the support and encouragement they\u2019ve shown me through all this. I love you!! Now I want to thank all of you that came here today to be with me. I know most of you are here to see me suffer and die but you\u2019re in for a big disappointment because today is a day of joy. Today is the day I\u2019ll be set free from all this pain and suffering. Today I\u2019m going home to HEAVEN to live for all eternity with my HEAVENLY FATHER JESUS CHRIST, and as I lay here taking my last breath, I\u2019ll be praying for all of you because you\u2019re here today with anger and hatred in your hearts letting Satan deceive you into believing that what you\u2019re doing is right and just. GOD help you, because what you\u2019re doing here today and what\u2019s in your hearts here today makes you no better than any man or woman on death-rows across this country. Today you\u2019re committing murder too!!! I pray on my own behalf for forgiveness for any and all of the pain I\u2019ve caused you, I pray that some day you\u2019ll realize your own mistakes and ask GOD to forgive you as I have, because there is no peace without GOD\u2019s forgiveness. \u000aAmen.\u000a\u000a
p206
aV\u000aI want you to know that I did not kill anyone. I love you all. (Offender\u2019s words were not clear)\u000a\u000a
p207
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p208
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p209
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p210
aV\u000aThank the Lord for the past 14 years that have allowed me to grow as a man \u2013\u000aTo J.D.\u2019s family, I am sorry for the suffering you have gone through the past 14 years. I hope you can get some peace tonight.\u000aTo my family, I am happy to be going home to Jesus.\u000aSweet Jesus, here I come. Take me home. I am going your way.\u000a\u000a
p211
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p212
aV\u000aYes, I do. First of all, I want you to understand I speak the truth when I say I didn\u2019t kill your kids. Honestly I have not killed anyone. I wish you could get the rage from your hearts and you could see the truth and get rid of the hatred.\u000aI love you all \u2013 (names of children) \u2013 Corey, Steve (garbled) \u2013 This is very important. I love ya\u2019ll and I miss ya\u2019ll. O.K., now I\u2019m finished.\u000a\u000a
p213
aV\u000aIt was horrible and inexcusable for me to take the life of your loved one and to hurt so many mentally and physically. I am here because I took a life and killing is wrong by an individual and by the state, and I am sorry we are here but if my death gives you peace and closure then this is all worthwhile. To all of my friends and family, I love you and I am going home -  \u000a\u000a
p214
aV\u000a(Mumbled.) Tell Mama I love her.\u000a\u000a
p215
aV\u000aNot from me but I have a message to you from God. Save the children. Find one who needs help and make a small sacrifice of your own wealth and save the innocent ones. They are the key for making the world a better place.\u000a\u000a
p216
aV\u000aThere are people all over the world who face things worse than death on a daily basis, and in that sense I consider myself lucky.\u000aI cannot find the words to express the sadness I feel for bringing this hurt and pain on my loved ones.\u000aI will not ask forgiveness for the decisions I have made in this judicial process, only acceptance.\u000aGod bless you all.\u000a\u000a
p217
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p218
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p219
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p220
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p221
aV\u000aI thank God that he died for my sins on the cross, and I thank Him for saving my soul, so I will know when my body lays back in the grave, my soul goes to be with the Lord. Praise God. I hope whoever hears my voice tonight will turn to the Lord. I give my spirit back to Him. Praise the Lord. Praise Jesus. Hallelujah.\u000a\u000a
p222
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p223
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p224
aV\u000aI want the world to know that I\u2019m innocent and that I\u2019ve found peace. Let\u2019s ride.  \u000a\u000a
p225
aV\u000aI would like to say \u2013 I just hope Ms. Fielder is happy now. I would like to thank my lawyer, Nancy, for her help on my case and for being with me now.\u000a\u000a
p226
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p227
aV\u000aI would like to say that I have no animosity toward anyone. I made a mistake 18 years ago \u2013 I lost control of my mind but I didn\u2019t mean to hurt anyone. I have no hate toward humanity. I hope He will forgive me for what I done. I didn\u2019t mean to.\u000a\u000a
p228
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p229
aV\u000aI would like to tell my family I love them. My attorneys did their best. All of my brothers on death row, those who died and those who are still there, to hang in there. And that's all I have to say.\u000a\u000a
p230
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p231
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p232
aV\u000aI forgive all of you \u2013 hope God forgives all of you too.\u000a\u000a
p233
aV\u000aI love you, Mom. Goodbye.\u000a\u000a
p234
aV\u000aThere\u2019s love and peace in Islam.\u000a\u000a
p235
aV\u000aI would like to thank my friends and family for sticking with me through all of this. I would like to encourage my brothers to continue to run the race. I thank my Father, God in Heaven, for the grace he has granted me \u2013  I am ready.\u000a\u000a
p236
aV\u000aThank you for being my Lord Jesus and Savior and I am ready to come home. Amen.  \u000a\u000a
p237
aV\u000aI have committed lots of sin in my life, but I am not guilty of this crime.\u000aI would like to tell my son, daughter and wife that I love them \u2013\u000aEden, if they want proof of them, give it to them. Thanks for being my friend.  \u000a\u000a
p238
aV\u000a\u2026guys like them got tied up in something like this. Thank Chaplain Taylor and Jane. I just got your letter. Thanks to Carolyn and Gloria, who have been my friends for over four years. I want to remember Patsy Buntion, Gladys and a lot more friends. I want to thank the prosecutor in my case; it took courage for him to do what he did but he did what he did because he believed in the judicial system.\u000aI\u2019m not ready to go, but I have no choice; I sent several letters to my family; they\u2019ll be very moving when you get them. I want to say goodbye again to my boys. I know I\u2019m missing somebody, but if there\u2019s anything I have left to say, it would be that I wish I had a Shakespearean vocabulary, but since I was raised in TDC, I missed out on some of my vocabulary.\u000aIf my words can persuade you to discontinue this practice of executing people, please do so. If the citizens don\u2019t do away with the death penalty, Texas won\u2019t be a safe place to be. I have no revenge because hate won\u2019t solve anything.\u000a(I gave Warden Hodges the phone at this time and he listened for 5-10 minutes. When he returned the phone to me, I could hear Kinnamon talking but evidently the phone was not close to the mike, because I could not understand him.)\u000a\u000a
p239
aV\u000aI told the daughter not to come. Discontinue; be quiet, please. Specifically, I want to say that the bad evil man I was when I came to death row 13 years ago is no more \u2013 by the power of God; Jesus Christ; God Almighty; Holy Spirit, he has transformed me as a new creature of Christ. I know that I am a Christ child and that my Lord will welcome me into His arms.\u000aJesus Christ is the Lord of Lords and the King of Kings. I love all of you, those I can and can\u2019t see. With the love of Christ, my love for you is secure and I love you purely and wholeheartedly in the name of the Almighty God.\u000a\u000a
p240
aV\u000aI'll see you.\u000a\u000a
p241
aV\u000a(Mumbled something about he wished his whole life would have been spent as Islamic.)\u000a\u000a
p242
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p243
aV\u000aI just love everybody, and that\u2019s it.\u000a\u000a
p244
aV\u000a(First two or three words not understood.) I don\u2019t know why Marta Glass wasn\u2019t allowed in here. I love you all. Keep the faith. Remember the death penalty is murder. They are taking the life of an innocent man. My attorney, Ron Kuley [unintelligible], will read my letter at a press conference after this is over. That is all I have to say. I love you all.\u000a\u000a
p245
aV\u000aTo my family who has kept me strong, I give my love.\u000a\u000a
p246
aV\u000aWell, I just wanted to ask people to pray for two families: my family and the family of Officer McCarthy. I appreciate the prayers. Lord Jesus, receive my spirit.\u000a\u000a
p247
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p248
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p249
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p250
aV\u000aPeace.\u000a\u000a
p251
aV\u000aGod, please forgive me of my sins. Look after my people. Bless and protect all people. I am sorry for my sins. Lord, take me home with you. Amen. (A couple of sentences garbled.)\u000a\u000a
p252
aV\u000aI want to express my feelings regarding the mishap of the deceased Mrs. Iris Siff. That was a very unfortunate incident and only God knows why it was an unintentional situation that took place. I want to express my remorse to the family and the discomfort and pain I caused in their lives. Only God will determine if I am truly guilty or innocent of being the type of person I have been drawn up to be by the press and media. I have given my wife the power and energy to be a disciple of Islam. I rescued her from a wretched life in Ireland. I thank Allah for sending her to me. Certainly murder cannot be an instrument of Allah. My wife is very devoted.\u000a\u000a
p253
aV\u000aI just want to tell my family I love them, and I thank the Lord Jesus for giving me another chance and for saving me.\u000a\u000a
p254
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p255
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p256
aV\u000aThis execution is not justice. This execution is an act of revenge! If this is justice, then justice is blind. Take a borderline retarded young male who for the 1st time ever in his life committed a felony then contaminate his TRUE tell all confession add a judge who discriminates plus an ALL-WHITE JURY pile on an ineffective assistance of counsel and execute the option of rehabilitation persecute the witnesses and you have created a death sentence for a family lasting over 10 years.\u000aI will say once again\u2026..This execution isn\u2019t justice \u2013 but an act of revenge. Killing R.J. will not bring Anil back, it only justifies "an eye for an eye and a tooth for a tooth." It\u2019s too late to help R.J., but maybe this poem will help someone else out there.\u000a"Seeing Through the Eyes of a Death Row Inmate"\u000aSometime I wonder why, why he? Why did he go out into the world to see? To be out there and see what really did exist, now his name is written down on the Death Row list. I can only imagine how lonesome he was all by himself. We both knew he had no future left! His hopes and dreams became a fantasy. He often said, "There\u2019s nothing left of me." I have asked myself, why did he get involved with drugs? He could never explain why he hung around with thugs? Did it really make him feel like a king \u2013 Did he actually think he was capable of getting away with anything? He knew the thought of life wasn\u2019t ticking in his head. There\u2019s nothing left but the memory of those who lay dead. What was did, cannot be undone. He was confessed, he was one of the guilty ones. What would he say to the victim\u2019s family? \u2013 I\u2019m sorry and my head wasn\u2019t on straight. I hope you will accept my apology, even though it\u2019s too late. I never knew I would take a life and commit a crime. I regret it because now I have to face the lethal injection while doing death row time. I knew I would pay with struggle and strife, but I never thought the cost would be me losing my life.\u000aRichard J. Wilkerson\u000aWritten through his sister Michelle Winn\u000a\u000a
p257
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p258
aV\u000aI\u2019m an African warrior, born to breathe, and born to die.\u000a\u000a
p259
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p260
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p261
aV\u000aI would like to tell my family I love them very dearly, and I know they love me. I love all of the people who supported me all of these years. I would like to tell the Merka family I love them, too. I plead with all the teenagers to stop the violence and to accept Jesus Christ and find victory. Today I have victory in Christ and I thank Jesus for taking my spirit into His precious hands. Thank you, Jesus.  \u000a\u000a
p262
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p263
aV\u000aI am the sinner of all sinners.  I was responsible for the \u201975 and \u201979 cases. My trial was not just; it was not fair; they lied against me. I love all of those on Death Row, and I will always hold them in my hands. Those who stood by me, I will always love you. Jim and Judy Peterson and Chaplain Lopez, I thank you for staying by my side.\u000a\u000a
p264
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p265
aV\u000aI am innocent, innocent, innocent. Make no mistake about this; I owe society nothing. Continue the struggle for human rights, helping those who are innocent, especially Mr. Graham. I am an innocent man, and something very wrong is taking place tonight. May God bless you all. I am ready.  \u000a\u000a
p266
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p267
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p268
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p269
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p270
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p271
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p272
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p273
aV\u000aHigh Flight (aviation poem)\u000a\u000a
p274
aV\u000aWhen his attorney came into the witness room, he said, "Tell Mom I love her." The attorney said back to him, "I love you, too."\u000a\u000a
p275
aV\u000aThanked his family.\u000a\u000a
p276
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p277
aV\u000aI just want everyone to know that the prosecutor and Bill Scott are sorry sons of bitches. To his family he added that he loved them all.\u000a\u000a
p278
aV\u000aNone. But as he lay there he did praise the Lord and seemed to be praying.\u000a\u000a
p279
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p280
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p281
aV\u000aLet\u2019s do it, man. Lock and load. Ain\u2019t life a [expletive deleted] ?\u000a\u000a
p282
aV\u000aHis final statement lasted 3 minutes. He thanked everybody that fought against his sentence. He spoke to his family and said he would carry their love with him.  \u000a\u000a
p283
aV\u000aI don\u2019t think so. That\u2019s all. Go ahead. Start things rolling. (Mouthed "Hi, Mom" to his mother.)\u000a\u000a
p284
aV\u000aI\u2019m going to a beautiful place. O.K., Warden, roll \u2018em.\u000a\u000a
p285
aV\u000aI\u2019m ready, Warden.\u000a\u000a
p286
aV\u000aI just ask everybody I ever hurt or done anything wrong to, to just forgive me for whatever wrongs I done to them.\u000a\u000a
p287
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p288
aV\u000aI would like to point out that I have written a statement and the Warden will give you a copy. I still proclaim I am innocent, and that\u2019s all I have to say.\u000a\u000a
p289
aV\u000aI wish everybody a good life. Everything is O.K.\u000a\u000a
p290
aV\u000aI want to say I hold no grudges. I hate no one. I love my family. Tell everyone on death row to keep the faith and don\u2019t give up.\u000a\u000a
p291
aV\u000aI hope Mrs. Howard can find peace in this.\u000a\u000a
p292
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p293
aV\u000aI would like to tell Mr. Richard that I appreciate all he has done for me. I love you all. God bless. Goodbye, David.  \u000a\u000a
p294
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p295
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p296
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p297
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p298
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p299
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p300
aV\u000aMother, I am sorry for all the pain I\u2019ve caused you. Please forgive me. Take good care of yourself. Ernest and Otis, watch out for the family. Thank all of you who have helped me.\u000a\u000a
p301
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p302
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p303
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p304
aV\u000aI want to say I\u2019m sorry for the things I\u2019ve done and I hope I\u2019m forgiven. I don\u2019t hold nothing against no one \u2013 Everyone has treated me well and I know it\u2019s not easy for them \u2013 That\u2019s all, I\u2019m sorry.\u000a\u000a
p305
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p306
aV\u000aTell my mother I love her and continue on without me. God bless her. Tell the guys on death row to continue their struggle to get off death row. That\u2019s about it.\u000a\u000a
p307
aV\u000aGoodbye to my family; I love all of you, I\u2019m sorry for the victim\u2019s family. I wish I could make it up to them. I want those out there to keep fighting the death penalty.\u000a\u000a
p308
aV\u000aI have no last words. I am ready.\u000a\u000a
p309
aV\u000aGoodbye to all my friends; be cool. Thank you for being my friends. Give my love to everybody.\u000a\u000a
p310
aV\u000a"Be strong for me," Pinkerton told his father, Gene Pinkerton, as witnesses entered the execution chamber. "I want you to know I\u2019m at peace with myself and with my God," Pinkerton said. He recited a prayer to Allah, the supreme being of Islam. "I bear witness that there is no God but Allah. With your praise I ask for forgiveness and I return unto you," Pinkerton said. "I love you, Dad."\u000a\u000a
p311
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p312
aV\u000aI deserve this. Tell everyone I said goodbye.\u000a\u000a
p313
aV\u000aD.J., Laurie, Dr. Wheat, about all I can say is goodbye, and for all the rest of you, although you don\u2019t forgive me for my transgressions, I forgive yours against me. I am ready to begin my journey and that\u2019s all I have to say.\u000a\u000a
p314
aV\u000aI want to thank Father Walsh for his spiritual help. I want to thank Bob Ray (Sanders) and Steve Blow for their friendship. What I want people to know is that they call me a cold-blooded killer when I shot a man that shot me first. The only thing that convicted me was that I am a Mexican and that he was a police officer. People hollered for my life, and they are to have my life tonight. The people never hollered for the life of the policeman that killed a thirteen-year-old boy who was handcuffed in the back seat of a police car. The people never hollered for the life of a Houston police officer who beat up and drowned Jose Campo Torres and threw his body in the river. You call that equal justice. This is your equal justice. This is America\u2019s equal justice. A Mexican\u2019s life is worth nothing. When a policeman kills someone he gets a suspended sentence or probation. When a Mexican kills a police officer this is what you get. From there you call me a cold-blooded murderer. I didn\u2019t tie anyone to a stretcher. I didn\u2019t pump any poison into anybody\u2019s veins from behind a locked door. You call this justice. I call this and your society a bunch of cold-blooded murderers. I don\u2019t say this with any bitterness or anger. I just say this with truthfulness. I hope God forgives me for all my sins. I hope that God will be as merciful to society as he has been to me. I\u2019m ready, Warden.  \u000a\u000a
p315
aV\u000a There\u2019s no God but Allah, and unto thy I belong and unto thy I return. I want to continue to tell my brothers and sisters to be strong.  \u000a\u000a
p316
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p317
aV\u000aHeavenly Father, I give thanks for this time, for the time that we have been together, the fellowship in your world, the Christian family presented to me (He called the names of the personal witnesses.). Allow your holy spirit to flow as I know your love as been showered upon me. Forgive them for they know not what they do, as I know that you have forgiven me, as I have forgiven them. Lord Jesus, I commit my soul to you, I praise you, and I thank you.\u000a\u000a
p318
aV\u000aI pray that my family will rejoice and will forgive, thank you.\u000a\u000a
p319
aV\u000aWhat is about to transpire in a few moments is wrong! However, we as human beings do make mistakes and errors. This execution is one of those wrongs yet doesn\u2019t mean our whole system of justice is wrong. Therefore, I would forgive all who have taken part in any way in my death. Also, to anyone I have offended in any way during my 39 years, I pray and ask your forgiveness, just as I forgive anyone who offended me in any way. And I pray and ask God\u2019s forgiveness for all of us respectively as human beings. To my loved ones, I extend my undying love. To those close to me, know in your hearts I love you one and all. God bless you all and may God\u2019s best blessings be always yours. Ronald C. O\u2019Bryan P.S. During my time here, I have been treated well by all T.D.C. personnel. \u000a\u000a
p320
aV\u000aThis offender declined to make a last statement.  \u000a\u000a
p321
aV\u000aStatement to the Media: I, at this very moment, have absolutely no fear of what may happen to this body.  My fear is for Allah, God only, who has at this moment the only power to determine if I should live or die... As a devout Muslim, I am taught and believe that this material life is only for the express purpose of preparing oneself for the real life that is to come... Since becoming Muslim, I have tried to live as Allah wanted me to live.\u000aSpoken:\u000aYes, I do. \u000a  I love you. \u000a  Asdadu an la ilah illa Allah, \u000a  Asdadu an la ilah illa Allah, \u000a  Asdadu anna Muhammadan Rasul Allah,\u000a  Asdadu anna Muhammadan Rasul Allah. \u000a  I bear witness that there is no God but Allah. \u000a  I bear witness that Muhammad is the messenger of Allah. \u000a  Inna li-Allah wa-inna ilayhi rajiun. \u000a  Verily unto Allah do we belong, Verily unto him do we return.\u000a  Be strong.  \u000a\u000a
p322
a.